Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
586

DOMESTIC
ABUSE PROTECTIVE ORDERS

Part I. General Provisions

Section

586-1 Definitions

586-2 Court jurisdiction

586-3 Order for protection

586-4 Temporary restraining order

586-5 Period of order; hearing

586-5.5 Protective order; additional orders

586-5.6 Effective date

586-5.8 Transfer or release of domestic violence
victims

from shared wireless plans

586-6 Notice of order

586-7 Assistance of police in service or
execution

586-8 Right to apply for relief

586-9 Modification of order

586-10 Copy to law enforcement agency

586-10.5 Reports by the department of human
services;

court responsibilities

586-11 Violation of an order for protection

Part II. Foreign Protective Orders

586-21 Foreign protective orders

586-22 Valid protective order

586-23 Filing of foreign protective order

586-24 Enforcement of foreign protective orders

586-25 Good faith immunity

586-26 Penalties

Cross References

Dependent adult protective services, see §§346-221 to 253.

Domestic violence fatality review, see §§321-471 to 476.

Domestic violence victims, early termination of
tenancy and other rights, see §§521-80 to 521-82.

Law Journals and Reviews

Hamilton v. Lethem: The Parental Right to Discipline One's
Child Trumps a Child's Right to Grow Up Free from Harm. 36 UH L. Rev. 347
(2014).

Case Notes

A protective order under this chapter does not
unconstitutionally curtail a person's freedom of movement. 85 H. 197 (App.),
940 P.2d 404.

No equal protection violation for use of preponderance of
evidence standard of proof for §586-5.5 as family and household members not
suspect class and rational basis underlying this standard adopted by
legislature under chapter 571 for this chapter was to facilitate and expedite
judicial issuance of protective orders. 85 H. 197 (App.), 940 P.2d 404.

Under §§571-14(a)(8) and 571-42, family court is vested with
exclusive jurisdiction over proceedings under this chapter and applicable
standard of proof to be applied in those proceedings is preponderance of the
evidence. 85 H. 197 (App.), 940 P.2d 404.

Unless expressly permitted by the court, §134-7(f)
unqualifiedly prohibits a person subject to an order under this chapter from
possession and control of a firearm during the pendency of that order; this
prohibition is effective irrespective of whether the respondent owned the
firearms involved. 91 H. 438 (App.), 984 P.2d 1264.

Pursuant to this chapter, absent special circumstances, the
family court should not be involved in any stage of the prosecution of an
allegation of a knowing or intentional violation of a protective order by an
adult person, including the stage where the allegations are referred to the
police or the prosecutor, other than to simply advise interested parties that
the proper place to present such allegations is to the police or the
prosecutor, not to the family court. 99 H. 363 (App.), 55 P.3d 856.

The constitutional right to discipline is inherent in the
right to care, custody, and control of one's children; due process requires the
State provide meaningful standards to guide the application of its laws; the
appropriate standard for family courts to apply in contested chapter 586 show
cause hearings is whether the parent's discipline is reasonably related to the
purpose of safeguarding or promoting the welfare of the minor; in applying such
standard, circumstances, including factors such as the nature of the
misbehavior, the child's age and size, and nature and propriety of the force
used, should also guide the courts in this State. 126 H. 294, 270 P.3d 1024
(2012).

The process for obtaining an ex parte temporary restraining
order under this chapter did not fall short of the constitutional requirements
of procedural due process where the strength of the State's and petitioner's
interests, the "emergency nature of the decision", and the
"practical difficulties inherent in convening an immediate evidentiary
hearing" mitigated against requiring further procedural protections. 125
H. 330 (App.), 260 P.3d 1148 (2011).

This chapter is not unconstitutional, as the right of parents
to discipline their children is not unlimited; as parents do not possess a
fundamental right to inflict force or harm upon a child that the legislature
has deemed to be excessive and harmful to the child's welfare, a rational basis
review applied to this chapter; under that review, ex parte TROs under this
chapter were rationally related to the legitimate state interest in protecting
minors from physical and psychological harm. 125 H. 330 (App.), 260 P.3d 1148
(2011).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next